Georgia, session 2025_26, HB484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 28 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the General Assembly, is
amended in Code Section 28-4-3, relating to the creation, qualifications, and powers and
duties of the Office of Legislative Counsel, by revising subsection (e) as follows:
"(e) The legislative counsel shall provide for the compiling, indexing, editing, and
publication of the Georgia Laws containing the Acts and resolutions of the General
Assembly and other appropriate materials. Except as otherwise authorized in Code Section
50-18-2, such Acts and resolutions shall be published electronically or in hardbound
volumes in a manner which is suitable for retention as permanent records. In the case of
any special session of the General Assembly, however, the separate publication and
distribution of the Acts and resolutions enacted at that special session may be omitted, and
H. B. 484
- 1 -

LC 33 9779/AP
in such case the Acts and resolutions enacted at the special session shall be published
electronically or in print and distributed together with those enacted at the subsequent
regular session. Distribution of the Georgia Laws shall be carried out by the Secretary of
State as provided for in Code Section 45-13-22; and the Secretary of State shall notify the
legislative counsel of the numbers of volumes required to carry out such distribution."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended in Code Section 28-9-3, relating to and powers and duties of the
Code Revision Commission, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(17.1) To provide assistance and oversight for the digitization and electronic publication
of the Georgia Laws so as to create a permanent digital repository of the session laws of
Georgia and to provide single-point public access to the local and general Acts and the
resolutions of the General Assembly;"
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 484
- 2 -